North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 19A. Fishery Management Councils.

§ 113-259.
North Carolina members of the South Atlantic Fishery Management Council.

In pursuance of Section 302 of the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1801, et seq., there shall be at least two members of the South Atlantic Fishery Management Council from the State of North Carolina.

The first Council member shall be the principal State official with marine fishery management responsibility and expertise in the State, which official is the Director of the Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department or his designee.

Pursuant to the enabling legislation, other members from the state of North Carolina are selected by the United States Secretary of Commerce from a list of qualified individuals submitted by the Governor of the State. The list of nominees shall be compiled by the Marine Fisheries Commission and must be comprised of individuals who are knowledgeable and experienced with regard to the management, conservation, or commercial or recreational harvest of the fishery resources in the Atlantic Ocean seaward of the states of North Carolina, South Carolina, Georgia, and Florida. Prior to submission of the list of nominees, the Governor may consult with the Commission regarding additions to the list of nominees to be submitted. Should it be necessary for the Governor to submit additional nominees, the list of nominees shall be compiled by the Marine Fisheries Commission.

History.

1987, c. 641, s. 18; 1989, c. 727, s. 111; 1998-225, s. 4.23.

§ 113-260.
North Carolina members of the Mid-Atlantic Fishery Management Council.

In pursuance of Section 302 of the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act, 16 U.S.C. § 1801, et seq., there shall be at least two members of the Mid-Atlantic Fishery Management Council from the State of North Carolina.

The first Council member shall be the principal State official with marine fishery management responsibility and expertise in the State, which official is the Director of the Division of Marine Fisheries of the Department or his designee.

Pursuant to the enabling legislation, other members from the State of North Carolina are selected by the United States Secretary of Commerce from a list of qualified individuals submitted by the Governor of the State. The list of nominees shall be compiled by the Marine Fisheries Commission and must be comprised of individuals who are knowledgeable and experienced with regard to the management, conservation, or commercial or recreational harvest of the fishery resources in the Atlantic Ocean seaward of the states of New York, New Jersey, Delaware, Pennsylvania, Maryland, Virginia, and North Carolina. Prior to submission of the list of nominees, the Governor may consult with the Commission regarding additions to the list of nominees to be submitted. Should it be necessary for the Governor to submit additional nominees, the list of nominees shall be compiled by the Marine Fisheries Commission.

History.

1998-225, s. 4.23.

§§ 113-260.1 through 113-260.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.